Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-818
Judicial officeholder; request to be retained; failure to file; vacancy.

Unless the judicial officeholder, who is subject to sections 24-813 to 24-818, files with the Secretary of State within the time and in the manner provided in section 24-814 an indication of his desire to continue in office for an additional term, a vacancy in said office shall occur at the end of the term of office of said judge.

Laws 1963, c. 125, § 6, p. 478.